Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.3 Public Drinking Water Supply System Protection
46-15.3-11.
Disbursements from the funds.

Only suppliers which withdraw water from wells, reservoirs, springs, or other original sources of potable water shall be entitled to disbursements from the first of the two (2) mentioned funds created under §

46-15.3-10

administered by the water resources board. From amounts available from bond proceeds held by the water resources board, that board shall disburse to each supplier contributing to the fund a proportional amount based upon each supplier’s pro rata withdrawal of water by volume from wells, reservoirs, springs, or other original sources of water averaged over the three (3) calendar years preceding disbursement as determined by the water resources board. Suppliers shall be required to expend this money as follows:

Not less than fifty-five percent (55%) shall be spent for acquisition of land or rights in land or physical improvements to acquired land required to protect the quality of raw water of the water supply system. Expenditures for maintenance, administration, and payment of taxes on land acquired under this chapter shall be included within this subdivision.

Any remaining funds may be used for any eligible expenditures as defined in §

46-15.3-4

.

The city of Providence shall make expenditures from amounts available in the fund held by the city of Providence based on the same formula as in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) above; provided, however, the city of Providence shall be exempt from participating in the use of an alternate deicing mixture within the Scituate watershed unless drinking water supply sodium levels exceed fifteen (15) ppm (parts per million) for three (3) consecutive years or seventeen (17) ppm (parts per million) for one year. The city of Providence will monitor sodium levels and report sodium testing results to the Rhode Island department of health and the public on a yearly basis. If drinking water supply sodium levels exceed fifteen (15) ppm for three (3) consecutive years or seventeen (17) ppm for one year, the city of Providence shall immediately participate in the use of an alternative deicing mixture within the Scituate watershed. In December of 2008, the city of Providence will provide a three (3) year report to the Rhode Island department of environmental management, the general assembly and the public. Every three (3) years, the city of Providence will submit a report to the general assembly on monitoring data for sodium levels within the Scituate watershed. This report will include monitoring data from the previous three (3) year period.

In making decisions about the expenditure of money under the provisions of this chapter, suppliers shall take into account the following factors:

The likelihood of development of the specific parcel proposed for acquisition;

The existing land uses, as well as the likelihood of development, in the watershed;

The potential threat to public drinking water sources posed by development in the watershed including, but not limited to, the intensity of development, the types of land uses, proximity to reservoirs and/or well heads, and the buffering and filtration capacity of the natural systems;

Whether alternative protection measures are available and/or have been attempted, including local land use regulations;

The number of persons who presently depend on the sources for their drinking water, as well as the number of persons who may depend on it in the future;

The anticipated cost of the parcel proposed to be purchased, and whether less than a fee interest may be acquired which would reduce the cost significantly while still providing protection to the source;

Other cost effectiveness considerations, including whether protection of the source can be provided by the construction of physical improvements;

Whether acquisition of the specific parcel, and the protection of the watershed of which it is a part, is consistent with other planning considerations;

Proposed management techniques for the parcel proposed to be acquired which will maximize its capacity to protect the source.

The costs of issuance of notes and bonds authorized by §

46-15.3-10

may be payable from any monies in the water quality protection funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 472, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 195, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 200, § 2.

46-15.3-12.
Dissolution.

If the board shall be dissolved, all funds of the board not required for the payment of bonds shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state, and all property belonging to the board shall be vested in the state and delivered to it. If the fund for the city of Providence shall be dissolved, all the funds not required for the payment of bonds shall be paid to the city of Providence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1.

46-15.3-13.
Severability — Construction.

If any provision of this chapter shall be held invalid in any circumstance, the invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or circumstances.

This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, all steps shall be taken which are necessary to meet constitutional requirements whether or not the steps are required by statute.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purposes. The powers granted hereby shall be in addition to, independent of, and not in substitution for any other powers granted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1.

46-15.3-14.
Repealed.

46-15.3-15.
Repealed.

46-15.3-16.
Actions by the department of health.

The department of health shall review each water supply system management plan, replacement or amendment thereto filed with it, submit comments in writing to the water resources board, as to its completeness, appropriateness for the area served, and adequacy to achieve the objectives of this chapter, and, as appropriate, to meet the requirements of the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, Chapter 13 of this title, Public Drinking Water Supply, and Chapter 14 of this title, Contamination of Drinking Water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-17.
Actions by the department of environmental management.

The department of environmental management shall review each water supply system management plan, replacement or amendment thereto filed with it, and submit comments in writing to the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-18.
Actions by the division of planning of the department of administration.

The division of planning of the department of administration shall:

Review each water supply system management plan, replacement, or amendment thereto submitted by a water supplier as provided by §

46-15.3-5.1

and submit comments in writing to the water resources board. Water supply system management plans or amendments thereto prepared by municipalities as required by §

46-15.3-5.1

shall be reviewed as provided by chapter 22.2 of title 45.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-19.
Actions by the division of public utilities and carriers and the public utilities commission.

The division of public utilities and carriers shall review each water supply system management plan, replacement or amendment thereto filed with it by a regulated water supplier and submit comments in writing to the water resources board as to its completeness, appropriateness for the area served and adequateness to achieve the objective of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-20.
Enforcement.

The water resources board shall forward any determination of non-compliance made pursuant to §§

46-15.3-7.5

and

46-15.3-7.6

to the division of public utilities and carriers. The division of public utilities and carriers shall consider such determinations of non-compliance as a complaint under §

39-4-3

.

The order of the division of public utilities and carriers may be appealed pursuant to §

39-5-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 23.

46-15.3-21.
Fees, rates and charges.

The fees, rates, and charges for drinking water are a mandatory component of water supply system management.

The following factors shall be considered in setting fees, rates, and charges:

Recovery of all capital and operating costs, fixed and variable of production, conservation, use, management, protection, obtaining, development, procuring, and/or transporting water, and its sale at wholesale or retail;

Marginal cost pricing;

Emergency and drought period surcharges;

Seasonal price structures;

Difference in costs based upon different points of delivery;

The effect of fees, rates, and charges on use of water and, where applicable, on wastewater costs and charges;

The effect of reducing leakage to levels consistent with stated goals;

Preparing, maintaining and implementing water supply system management programs; and

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Providence water supply board shall transfer to the general fund of the city of Providence an amount equal to five percent (5%) per annum times the annual gross revenues of the Providence water supply board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, and for the next two (2) succeeding fiscal years. This transfer shall not be included as part of the Providence water supply board’s rates approved by a final unappealable order of the public utilities commission for the same three (3) fiscal years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

39-2-2

and

39-2-5

, all rates and charges made by water suppliers which decline as quantity used increased are hereby declared to be no longer conducive to sound water supply system management designed to properly conserve, develop, utilize, and protect this finite natural resource. The public utilities commission may order rates for suppliers of water which either do not vary with quantities used or when there is evidence of increasing costs to either the utility or to society, rates which increase as the quantity used increases. If the commission finds that changing rates to comply with this section will cause a hardship to a class of customers, the commission may order that rates for that class of customers be changed to comply with this section over a period of time not to exceed five (5) years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

39-2-2

and

39-2-5

, the public utilities commission may order a reduction in rates consistent with the amount by which a supplier exceeds the stated goals for leakage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 13; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8.

46-15.3-22.
Billing and collection of fees, rates, and charges.

Financial support of water supply and provision of timely and accurate information on costs to users are mandatory components of water supply system management.

All water suppliers shall meter all water delivered and shall maintain and replace meters in accordance with their management plans. Water suppliers that service the Town of Johnston shall formulate and carry out a program for installation of radio frequency reading systems. These programs shall be initiated not later than December 31, 2015.

Water suppliers shall record metered usage and bill quarterly or less frequently by December 31, 2013.

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8 and P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8].

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8; P.L. 2013, ch. 495, § 1.

46-15.3-23.
Sanitary device retrofitting.

Water supply system management shall include retrofitting existing water users not in conformance with the state plumbing code standards for new or replacement sanitary devices with water-saving plumbing equipment, including, but not limited to, low-flow faucet aerators and shower heads, toilet displacement equipment, and materials for toilet tank leak detection.

A water utility may act as a central purchaser and supplier of water efficiency devices which comply with state plumbing codes and may enter into cooperative agreements with other water suppliers or other agencies to facilitate bulk purchases of water efficiency devices required to implement, approved retrofit plans. A retrofitting program shall include, without limitation:

Annual notification to each residential class user of the objectives and accomplishments of the retrofit program and of the availability of water-saving plumbing devices at cost or at no direct cost;

Installation of water saving plumbing equipment for residential class users by the water supplier at cost or at no direct cost as scheduled in the water supply system management plan;

Technical assistance and water audits to formulate and implement retrofit programs for major multiple unit housing areas or developments and commercial and industrial users. Water suppliers may enter into cooperative agreements with the owners or management of such users for the preparation of specifications, bulk purchase, and installation of sanitary device retrofit equipment for the purpose of implementing retrofit programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-24.
Financing water supply system management.

The cost of water supply system management planning and water supply system management as required by this chapter shall be financed as follows:

The cost of preparing and maintaining water supply system management plans as required by § 46-15.3-5.1(A)(1) shall be paid by the municipality from any funds made available under chapter 22.2 of title 45 or from any other funds used to prepare, maintain, and amend local comprehensive plans. Expenses incurred in conducting these activities are exempt from reimbursement as a state mandate under §§

45-13-6

through

45-13-10

;

The cost of preparing and maintaining water supply system management plans and carrying out water supply system management programs as required by § 46-15.3-5.1(A)(2), shall be paid from charges against water users. Such charges shall be limited to those necessary and reasonable to undertake the actions required by this chapter, and shall be included in bills rendered in accordance with §

46-15.3-21(b)

;

A public or private utility, under the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission, providing water service may file with the public utilities commission proposed rates and charges, including emergency rate relief, so as to provide for the necessary and reasonable costs of carrying out the requirements of this chapter. The public utilities commission shall hear and decide such requests as provided by title 39, and shall allow adjustments in rates necessary to offset necessary and reasonable reductions in revenues resulting from implementation of a water supply system management program;

Water utilities will be operated as financially self-supporting agencies and shall maintain revenue levels sufficient to cover all fixed and variable capital and operating costs of conservation, use, management, protection, development and other costs of water supply and may be allowed a reasonable profit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-25.
Transfer of charges to Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, upon the dissolution of the water resources board (corporate) pursuant to §

46-15.1-22

, any charges remitted to the water resources board (corporate) pursuant to this chapter shall be remitted to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, a body politic and corporate and public instrumentality of the state established pursuant to chapter 12.2 of title 46.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 21.